src/fst/test/dict-gt-yamls/V-porshkueaqtted_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - porškueʹtted: # Verb 'begin to eat/alkaa syödä' - full paradigm
     porškueʹtted+V+Inf: porškueʹtted
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: [porškuäđam, porškuäʹđam]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: [porškuäđak, porškuäʹđak]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: porškuätt
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: porškueʹttep
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: porškueʹttveʹted
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: porškuäʹtte
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: porškuäʹđet
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: porškuäʹđ
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: [porškueʹttem, porškuõʹttem]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: [porškueʹttiǩ, porškuõʹttiǩ]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: [porškueʹđi, porškuõʹđi]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: [porškuõʹđim, porškuõʹđin, porškueʹđim, porškueʹđin]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: [porškuõʹđid, porškueʹđid]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: [porškueʹtte, porškuõʹtte]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: [porškueʹtteš, porškuõʹtteš]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: porškuättam
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg1: porškueʹđžem 
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg2: porškueʹđžiǩ
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg3: porškueʹđež
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl1: [porškueʹđžep, porškueʹđžim, porškueʹđžin]
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl2: porškueʹđžid
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Pl3: porškueʹđže
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+Sg4: porškueʹđžet
     porškueʹtted+V+Pot+ConNeg: porškueʹđže
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg1: [porškuäđčem, porškuäʹđčem]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg2: [porškuäđčiǩ, porškuäʹđčiǩ]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg3: [porškuäđči, porškuäʹđči]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl1: [porškuäđčim, porškuäđčin, porškuäđčep, porškuäʹđčim, porškuäʹđčin, porškuäʹđčep]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl2: [porškuäđčid, porškuäʹđčid]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Pl3: [porškuäđče, porškuäʹđče]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+Sg4: [porškuäđčeš, porškuäʹđčeš]
     porškueʹtted+V+Cond+ConNeg: [porškuäđče, porškuäʹđče]
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg2: porškuäʹđ
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+Sg3: porškuäʹđas
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl1: porškuäʹttep
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl2: porškueʹtted
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+Pl3: porškuättaz
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNeg: porškuäʹđ
     porškueʹtted+V+Imprt+ConNegII: [porškuåttu, porškuõttu]
     porškueʹtted+V+Actio+Ess: porškueʹttmen
     porškueʹtted+V+Actio: [porškueʹttem, porškuäʹttem]
     porškueʹtted+V+Act+PrsPrc: [porškuõʹtti, porškueʹtti]
     porškueʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: porškuättam
     porškueʹtted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: [porškuåttum, porškuõttum]
     porškueʹtted+V+VAbess: [porškueʹđkani, porškueʹđǩeännai]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ger+Ess: [porškuäʹđeen, porškueʹđeen]
     porškueʹtted+V+Ger+Instr: [porškuäʹđeeʹl, porškueʹđeeʹl]
     porškueʹtted+V+Act+PrfPrc: porškuättam
